California, session 20252026, AB765.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The Employment Training Panel is vital for workforce development and supports California’s economic competitiveness by addressing employer and worker needs for training and upskilling.(b) The use of the Employment Training Fund to pay down interest on federal loans undermines the Employment Training Panel’s purpose and hinders the state’s ability to foster a skilled workforce.(c) It is in the best interest of the state to ensure that Employment Training Panel funds are preserved exclusively for their intended purpose. SEC. 2. Section 1611 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:1611. (a) Moneys in the Employment Training Fund shall be expended only for the purposes of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 10200) of Part 1 of Division 3, and for the costs of administering this article and Section 976.6, except those moneys may be used for any of the following:(a)With the approval of the Legislature, the fund or contributions to it may be used to pay interest charged on federal loans to the Unemployment Fund.(b)(1) Commencing with allocations made to the Employment Training Panel in the 1992–93 fiscal year, any moneys allocated to the panel in a fiscal year that are not encumbered by the panel in that fiscal year shall revert to the Unemployment Insurance Fund.(c)(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the panel shall closely monitor program performance and expenditures for employment training programs administered by the panel, and that the panel shall expeditiously disencumber funds that are not needed for employment training program completion. Commencing with the 1992–93 fiscal year, those moneys that are disencumbered during the fiscal year that are not reencumbered during the same fiscal year shall revert to the Unemployment Insurance Fund.(d)(3) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the moneys in the Employment Training Fund for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. However, interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund from the Employment Training Fund. Interest payable shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which loaned. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that will interfere with the carrying out of the object for which the Employment Training Fund was created.(b) Moneys in the fund shall not be diverted, transferred, or otherwise used to pay interest charged on federal loans to the Unemployment Fund, or related liabilities, without the approval of the Legislature by statute and a public report justifying the necessity for the diversion, transfer, or use.